Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 5 Divorce and Separation

15-5-1.
Marriages void or voidable — Civil death or presumption of death.

Divorces from the bond of marriage shall be decreed in case of any marriage originally void or voidable by law, and in case either party is for crime deemed to be or treated as if civilly dead, or, from absence or other circumstances, may be presumed to be actually dead.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-1

.

15-5-2.
Additional grounds for divorce.

Divorces from the bond of marriage shall also be decreed for the following causes:

Impotency;

Adultery;

Extreme cruelty;

Willful desertion for five (5) years of either of the parties, or for willful desertion for a shorter period of time in the discretion of the court;

Continued drunkenness;

The habitual, excessive, and intemperate use of opium, morphine, or chloral;

Neglect and refusal, for the period of at least one year next before the filing of the petition, on the part of the husband to provide necessaries for the subsistence of his wife, the husband being of sufficient ability; and

Any other gross misbehavior and wickedness, in either of the parties, repugnant to and in violation of the marriage covenant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 2; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-2

; P.L. 1975, ch. 287, § 1.

15-5-3.
Separation of parties as ground for dissolution — Appeal.

Whenever, in the trial of any complaint for divorce from the bond of marriage or any complaint for dissolution of a marriage, it shall be alleged in the complaint that the parties have lived separate and apart from each other for the space of at least three (3) years, whether voluntarily or involuntary, the court shall, upon a finding that the allegation is true, enter a decision pending entry of final judgment of divorce, which may include provisions for alimony.

Final judgment shall not be entered until the expiration of twenty (20) days after entry of the decision pending entry of final judgment or, if the time for taking an appeal has been extended pursuant to Rule 4 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure, Article I, Rule 4 of the Supreme Court Rules, until the expiration of the extended period.

Final judgment may be entered ex parte and in chamber on the suggestion of the prevailing party.

If no final judgment is presented to the court for entry within one hundred eighty (180) days next after the expiration of twenty (20) days from the date of decision, a final judgment may be entered only in open court and on motion or written consent of the attorneys or parties.

Notice of the filing of the motion shall not be required in cases in which the original complaint is unanswered.

The taking of an appeal shall operate as a stay of the judgment during the pendency of the appeal. Upon motion and for good cause shown:

The family court may, prior to the filing of a notice of appeal, order that the judgment become final and operative immediately; and

The supreme court may, in the event an appeal is taken, vacate the automatic stay provided under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-3

; P.L. 1972, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 9; P.L. 2016, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 14, § 1.

15-5-3.1.
Divorce on grounds of irreconcilable differences.

A divorce from the bonds of matrimony shall be decreed, irrespective of the fault of either party, on the ground of irreconcilable differences which have caused the irremediable breakdown of the marriage.

In any pleading or hearing for divorce under this section, allegations or evidence of specific acts of misconduct shall be improper and inadmissible, except for the purpose of making a determination pursuant to §§

15-5-16

and

15-5-16

.1, or where child custody is in issue and the evidence is relevant to establish that parental custody would be detrimental to the child, or at a hearing where it is determined by the court to be necessary to establish the existence of irreconcilable differences.

Upon hearing of an action for divorce under this section, the acts of one party shall not negate the acts of the other nor bar the divorce decree.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 287, § 1; 1976, ch. 294, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 3.

15-5-4.
Collusion of parties.

Whenever it appears that the absence, adultery, cruelty, desertion, or other cause of complaint was committed or occasioned by the collusion of the parties, and done or contrived with an intention to procure a divorce, no divorce shall be decreed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-4

.

15-5-5.
Uncorroborated testimony of complainant.

Whenever the act or acts giving rise to the cause for divorce are of a nature that the complaining party could not ordinarily produce corroborating testimony, the court may, in its discretion, if it is satisfied of the existence of the cause in question, the proof in other respects being satisfactory, grant the divorce on the testimony of the complaining party alone.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 2; P.L. 1939, ch. 707, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-5

; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 25.

15-5-6 — 15-5-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, §§ 5-7; P.L. 1917, ch. 1532, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1956, §§

15-5-6

— 15-5-8; P.L. 1958, ch. 90, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 1.

15-5-9.
Divorce from bed and board.

Divorces from bed, board, and future cohabitation, until the parties are reconciled, may be granted for any of the causes for which by law a divorce from the bond of marriage may be decreed, and for other causes which may seem to require a divorce from bed and board; provided, the petitioner is a domiciled inhabitant of this state and has resided in this state for a length of time that, to the court in its discretion, seems to warrant the exercise of the powers in this section conferred. In case of a divorce from bed, board, and future cohabitation, the court may assign to the petitioner a separate maintenance out of the estate or property of the husband or wife, as the case may be, in a manner and of an amount as it may think necessary or proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 8; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 8; P.L. 1954, ch. 3308, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3692, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-9

.

15-5-10.
Disposal of certain real estate after filing of complaint.

At any time after the filing of a complaint for divorce from bed, board, and future cohabitation, and until a decree of reconciliation has been entered, the court, upon the petition of either party seized in his or her own right of real estate in Rhode Island, after notice to the opposing party, after a hearing on the petition, may, if the court finds that justice and the best interests of the party require, enter a decree permitting the party to sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the real estate free of the rights of life estates created by chapter 25 of title 33 of the opposing party. The decree shall contain a description of the real estate sufficient to identify it either by reference to a recorded plat or otherwise, and a certified copy of the decree shall be recorded in the records of land evidence of the city or town in which the real estate is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3692, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-10

; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 11.

15-5-11.
Verification of complaint.

Every complaint shall be verified by the plaintiff, if of sound mind and of legal age to consent to marriage; otherwise, upon application to the court and after notice to the party in whose name the complaint is filed, the court may allow the complaint to be verified by a resident guardian or next friend.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 9; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-11

; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 11.

15-5-12.
Domicile and residence requirements.

No complaint for divorce from the bond of marriage shall be granted unless the plaintiff has been a domiciled inhabitant of this state and has resided in this state for a period of one year next before the filing of the complaint; provided, that if the defendant has been a domiciled inhabitant of this state and has resided in this state for the period of one year next before the filing of the complaint, and is actually served with process, the requirement of this subsection as to domicile and residence on the part of the plaintiff is deemed satisfied and fulfilled. The residence and domicile of any person immediately prior to the commencement of his or her active service as a member of the armed forces or of the merchant marine of the United States, or immediately prior to his or her absence from the state in the performance of services in connection with military operations as defined in subsection (c) of this section, shall, for the purposes of this section, continue to be his or her residence and domicile during the time of his or her service and for a period of thirty (30) days after this. Testimony to prove domicile and residence may be received through the ex parte affidavit of one witness.

Every word importing the masculine gender only shall be construed in this section to extend to and include females as well as males.

The term “services in connection with military operations” shall be construed in this section to include persons serving with the American Red Cross, the Society of Friends, the Women’s Auxiliary Service Pilots, and the United Service Organizations.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 10; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 10; P.L. 1946, ch. 1682, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-12

; P.L. 1975, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 25.

15-5-13.
Venue.

All complaints for divorce from the bond of marriage and from bed and board and complaints for relief without commencement of divorce proceedings shall be filed in the county in which the plaintiff is residing, unless the complaint is based upon the residence of the defendant, in which case the complaint shall be filed in Providence County or in the county in which the defendant resides.

All complaints for divorce from the bond of marriage and from bed and board and complaints for relief without commencement of divorce proceedings may be tried and heard in the county in which the plaintiff resides, unless the complaint is based upon the residence of the defendant, in which case the complaint may be heard and tried in Providence County or in the county in which the defendant resides. In the interest of convenience, the court may, with the consent of the chief judge of the family court or any associate justice designated by him or her and the parties, order any such actions transferred to another county.

The chief judge of the family court, or his or her designee, in accordance with the provisions of the Family Court Act, §

8-10-14

, may order any complaint for divorce from the bond of marriage and from bed and board and complaints for relief without commencement of divorce proceedings to be transferred to Providence County for trial on the merits should it be determined by the trial judge in the county in which the action was originally brought that the trial would require a minimum of three (3) court days for testimony. Any complaint, which is transferred under this section, shall have priority on the trial calendar in Providence County.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 11; P.L. 1906, ch. 1304, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 11; P.L. 1942, ch. 1252, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2493, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 11; P.L. 1982, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 219, § 1.

15-5-14.
Return day of complaints — Notice — Issuance of process — Time of hearing.

The court may, by general rule:

Determine the return day of complaints for divorce;

Prescribe the notice to be given, within or without the state, on all complaints for divorce;

May issue any process that may be necessary to carry into effect all powers conferred upon the court in relation to complaints and divorce; and

Fix the times when all complaints for divorce shall be heard. These general rules shall be subject to special orders that the court may make in special cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-14

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 7; P.L. 1987, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 264, § 1.

15-5-14.1.
Automatic orders in divorce cases.

Upon the filing of a complaint for divorce, divorce from bed and board, legal separation, annulment, custody or visitation by the plaintiff and upon service of the petition and summons of the defendant or upon waiver and acceptance of service by the parties, the automatic orders shall be effective with regard to the plaintiff upon the signing of the complaint and with regard to the defendant upon service. A copy of the automatic order shall be served with the summons and complaint.

Neither party shall sell, transfer, encumber, conceal, assign, remove or in any way dispose of, without the consent of the other party in writing, or without an order of the court, any property, individually or jointly held by the parties, except in the usual course of business or for customary and usual household expenses or for reasonable attorneys’ fees in connection with this action. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create liability against or affect the validity of the title to real estate of any purchaser of real estate for value when the purchaser acts in good faith and without actual knowledge of the court’s order.

Neither party shall incur any unreasonable debts including, but not limited to, further borrowing against any credit line secured by the family residence, further encumbrance of any assets, or unreasonably using credit cards or cash advances against credit or bank cards. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create liability against the creditor under the terms of the original agreement when the creditor acts in good faith and without actual knowledge of the court’s order.

Neither party shall permanently remove the minor child or children from the state of Rhode Island without the written consent of the other party or an order of the court.

Neither party shall cause the other party or the children of the marriage to be removed from any medical, hospital and/or dental insurance coverage, and each party shall maintain the existing medical, hospital, and dental insurance coverage in full force and effect.

Neither party shall change the beneficiaries of any existing life insurance policies, and each party shall maintain the existing life insurance, automobile insurance, homeowner’s or renter’s insurance policies in full force and effect.

If the parties are living together on the date of service of these orders, neither party may deny the other party use of the current primary residence of the parties, whether it be owned or rented property, without court order. This provision shall not apply if there is a prior, contradictory court order.

If the parties share a child or children, a party vacating the family residence shall notify the other party or the other party’s attorney, in writing, within forty-eight (48) hours of such move, of an address where the relocated party can receive communication. This provision shall not apply if there is a prior, contradictory court order.

If the parents of the children live apart during the dissolution proceeding, they shall assist their children in having contact with both parties, which is consistent with the habits of the family, personally, by telephone, and in writing unless there is a prior court order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 280, § 1.

15-5-15.
Orders as to notice.

Whenever any petition for divorce has been filed or is pending in the family court, and the court is of the opinion that sufficient notice of the pendency of the petition has not, from any cause, been given to the adverse party, the court may order notice or further notice to the adverse party to be given in the manner that the court may prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-15

; P.L. 1982, ch. 63, § 1.

15-5-16.
Alimony and counsel fees — Custody of children.

In granting any petition for divorce, divorce from bed and board, or relief without the commencement of divorce proceedings, the family court may order either of the parties to pay alimony or counsel fees, or both, to the other.

In determining the amount of alimony or counsel fees, if any, to be paid, the court, after hearing the witnesses, if any, of each party, shall consider:

The length of the marriage;

The conduct of the parties during the marriage;

The health, age, station, occupation, amount and source of income, vocational skills, and employability of the parties; and

The state and the liabilities and needs of each of the parties.

In addition, the court shall consider:

The extent to which either party is unable to support herself or himself adequately because that party is the primary physical custodian of a child whose age, condition, or circumstances make it appropriate that the parent not seek employment outside the home, or seek only part-time or flexible-hour employment outside the home;

The extent to which either party is unable to support herself or himself adequately with consideration given to:

The extent to which a party was absent from employment while fulfilling homemaking responsibilities, and the extent to which any education, skills, or experience of that party have become outmoded and his or her earning capacity diminished;

The time and expense required for the supported spouse to acquire the appropriate education or training to develop marketable skills and find appropriate employment;

The probability, given a party’s age and skills, of completing education or training and becoming self-supporting;

The standard of living during the marriage;

The opportunity of either party for future acquisition of capital assets and income;

The ability to pay of the supporting spouse, taking into account the supporting spouse’s earning capacity, earned and unearned income, assets, debts, and standard of living;

Any other factor which the court expressly finds to be just and proper.

For the purposes of this section, “alimony” is construed as payments for the support or maintenance of either the husband or the wife.

Alimony is designed to provide support for a spouse for a reasonable length of time to enable the recipient to become financially independent and self-sufficient. However, the court may award alimony for an indefinite period of time when it is appropriate in the discretion of the court based upon the factors set forth in subdivision (b)(2)(ii)(B). After a decree for alimony has been entered, the court may from time to time upon the petition of either party review and alter its decree relative to the amount and payment of the alimony, and may make any decree relative to it which it might have made in the original suit. The decree may be made retroactive in the court’s discretion to the date that the court finds that a substantial change in circumstances has occurred; provided, the court shall set forth in its decision the specific findings of fact which show a substantial change in circumstances and upon which findings of facts the court has decided to make the decree retroactive. Nothing provided in this section shall affect the power of the court as subsequently provided by law to alter, amend, or annul any order of alimony previously entered. Upon the remarriage of the spouse who is receiving alimony, the obligation to pay alimony shall automatically terminate at once.

In regulating the custody of the children, the court shall provide for the reasonable right of visitation by the natural parent not having custody of the children, except upon the showing of cause why the right should not be granted or as provided in subdivision

15-5-16(d)(4)

. The court shall mandate compliance with its order by both the custodial parent and the children. In the event of noncompliance, the noncustodial parent may file a motion for contempt in family court. Upon a finding by the court that its order for visitation has not been complied with, the court shall exercise its discretion in providing a remedy, and define the noncustodial parent’s visitation in detail. However, if a second finding of noncompliance by the court is made, the court shall consider this to be grounds for a change of custody to the noncustodial parent.

In regulating the custody and determining the best interests of children, the fact that a parent is receiving public assistance shall not be a factor in awarding custody.

A judicial determination that the child has been physically or sexually abused by the natural parent shall constitute sufficient cause to deny the right of visitation. However, when the court enters an order denying visitation under this section, it shall review the case at least annually to determine what, if any, action the parent has taken to rehabilitate himself or herself and whether the denial of visitation continues to be in the child’s best interests.

No person shall be granted custody of or visitation with a child if that person has been convicted under or pled nolo contendere to a violation of §§

11-37-2

,

11-37-4

, or

11-37-8.1

or other comparable law of another jurisdiction, and the child was conceived as a result of that violation; unless after hearing the family court finds that the natural mother or legal guardian consents to visitation with the child, and the court determines that visitation is in the best interest of the child, then the court may order supervised visitation and counseling.

The court may order a natural parent who has been denied the right of visitation due to physical or sexual abuse of his or her child to engage in counseling. The failure of the parent to engage in counseling, ordered by the court pursuant to this section, shall constitute sufficient cause to deny visitation.

In all hearings regarding denial of visitation, the court shall make findings of fact.

This chapter does not affect the right of the family court to award alimony or support pendente lite.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and §

15-5-19

, the court, when making decisions regarding child custody and visitation, shall consider evidence of past or present domestic violence. Where domestic violence is proven, any grant of visitation shall be arranged so as to best protect the child and the abused parent from further harm.

In addition to other factors that a court must consider in a proceeding in which the court has made a finding of domestic or family violence, the court shall consider as primary the safety and well-being of the child and of the parent who is the victim of domestic or family violence. The court shall also consider the perpetrator’s history of causing physical harm, bodily injury or assault to another person.

In a visitation or custody order, as a condition of the order, the court may:

Order the perpetrator of domestic violence to attend and successfully complete, to the satisfaction of the court, a certified batterer’s intervention program;

Order the perpetrator to attend a substance abuse program whenever deemed appropriate;

Require that a bond be filed with the court in order to ensure the return and safety of the child;

Order that the address and telephone number of the child be kept confidential;

Order an exchange of the child to occur in a protected setting, or supervised by another person or agency; provided that, if the court allows a family or household member to supervise visitation, the court shall establish conditions to be followed during visitation;

Order the perpetrator of domestic violence to abstain from possession or consumption of alcohol or controlled substances during the visitation; and

Impose any other condition that is deemed necessary to provide for the safety of the child, the victim of domestic violence, or other family or household member.

“Domestic violence” means the occurrence of one or more of the following acts between spouses or people who have a child in common:

Attempting to cause or causing physical harm;

Placing another in fear of imminent serious physical harm;

Causing another to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force, or duress.

In every proceeding in which there is at issue the modification of an order for custody or visitation of a child, the finding that domestic or family violence has occurred since the last custody determination constitutes a prima facie finding of a change of circumstances.

The fact that a parent is absent or relocates because of an act of domestic or family violence by the other parent shall not weigh against the relocating or absent parent in determining custody and visitation.

A party’s absence, relocation, or failure to comply with custody and visitation orders shall not, by itself, be sufficient to justify a modification of a custody or visitation order if the reason for the absence, relocation, or failure to comply is the party’s activation to military service or deployment out of state.

If there is no existing order establishing the terms of parental rights and responsibilities or parent-child contact and it appears that deployment or mobilization is imminent, upon motion by either parent, the court shall expedite a hearing to establish temporary parental rights and responsibilities and parent-child contact to ensure the deploying parent has access to the child, to ensure disclosure of information, to grant other rights and duties set forth herein, and to provide other appropriate relief. Any initial pleading filed to establish parental rights and responsibilities for or parent-child contact with a child of a deploying parent shall be so identified at the time of filing by stating in the text of the pleading the specific facts related to deployment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 406, § 5; P.L. 1981, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 79, § 1; P.L.1991, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 9.

Parties to Proceedings.

The court before which an alimony petition was pending had power to bring in a corporation to which the husband had transferred property and to appoint a receiver for the corporation where the transfer to the corporation was for the fraudulent purpose of preventing the recovery of alimony. Warren v. Warren,

36 R.I. 167

, 89 A. 651,

1914 R.I. LEXIS 10

(1914).

15-5-16.1.
Assignment of property.

In addition to or in lieu of an order to pay spousal support made pursuant to a complaint for divorce, the court may assign to either the husband or wife a portion of the estate of the other. In determining the nature and value of the property, if any, to be assigned, the court after hearing the witnesses, if any, of each party shall consider the following:

The length of the marriage;

The conduct of the parties during the marriage;

The contribution of each of the parties during the marriage in the acquisition, preservation, or appreciation in value of their respective estates;

The contribution and services of either party as a homemaker;

The health and age of the parties;

The amount and sources of income of each of the parties;

The occupation and employability of each of the parties;

The opportunity of each party for future acquisition of capital assets and income;

The contribution by one party to the education, training, licensure, business, or increased earning power of the other;

The need of the custodial parent to occupy or own the marital residence and to use or own its household effects taking into account the best interests of the children of the marriage;

Either party’s wasteful dissipation of assets or any transfer or encumbrance of assets made in contemplation of divorce without fair consideration; and

Any factor which the court shall expressly find to be just and proper.

The court may not assign property or an interest in property held in the name of one of the parties if the property was held by the party prior to the marriage, but may assign income which has been derived from the property during the term of the marriage, and the court may assign the appreciation of value from the date of the marriage of property or an interest in property which was held in the name of one party prior to the marriage which increased in value as a result of the efforts of either spouse during the marriage. The court also shall not assign property or an interest in property which has been transferred to one of the parties by inheritance before, during, or after the term of the marriage. The court shall not assign property or an interest in property which has been transferred to one of the parties by gift from a third party before, during, or after the term of the marriage.

The assignment of property, if any, to be made shall precede the award of alimony, since the needs of each party will be affected by the assignment of property, and once made in a final decree shall be final, subject only to any right of appeal which the parties may have. Any assignment made by the family court shall be regarded as a judgment for debt so that suit may be brought or execution may issue on the debt for the property due and undelivered, or the amount due and unpaid to be shown by affidavits of the person entitled to the property and the attorney of record of the person, the executions to run against the goods and chattels of the husband and wife, as the case may be; and the court may make all necessary orders and decrees concerning the suits or executions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 269, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 10; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 25.

15-5-16.1.1.
Deferment of sale of home.

As used in this section, the following words and terms have the following meanings unless the context indicates another or different meaning or intent:

“Custodial parent” means a party awarded physical custody of a child.

“Deferred sale of home order” means an order that temporarily delays the sale and awards the temporary exclusive use and possession of the family home to a custodial parent of minor children, or children for whom support is authorized under this chapter, whether or not the custodial parent has sole or joint custody, in order to minimize the adverse impact of divorce on the welfare of the children.

“Resident parent” means a party who has requested or who has already been awarded a deferred sale of home order.

In any case in which one of the parties has requested a deferred sale of home order pursuant to this section, the court shall first determine whether it is economically feasible to maintain the payments of any note secured by a mortgage or other liens, property taxes, or insurance for the home during the period the sale of the home is deferred. In making this determination, the court shall consider the resident parent’s income, the availability of spousal support, child support, or both spousal and child support, and any other sources of funds available to make those payments. The intent in requiring this determination is to avoid defaults on the payments of notes and resulting foreclosures, to avoid inadequate insurance coverage, to prevent deterioration of the condition of the family home, and to prevent any other circumstances which would jeopardize both parents’ equity in the home. After making the determination that it is economically feasible to consider ordering a deferred sale of the family home, the court in exercising its discretion to grant or deny a deferred sale of home order, shall consider whether it is in the best interest of the child or children.

Upon a determination pursuant to subsection (b) of this section that a deferred sale of home order is indicated in order to minimize the adverse impact of divorce on the child, the court may make such an order. The order shall include the duration of the order, may include the legal description and assessor’s plat and lot number of the real property which is subject to the order, and may be recorded in the office of the registry of deeds of the city or town in which the real property is located.

The court may make an order specifying the parties’ respective responsibilities for the payment of the costs of routine maintenance and capital improvements.

Except as otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing, the following shall apply:

A deferred sale of home order may be modified or terminated at any time at the discretion of the court.

If the party awarded the deferred sale of home order remarries, or if there is otherwise a change in circumstances affecting the determinations made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or affecting the economic status of the parties or the children on which the award is based, a rebuttable presumption, affecting the burden of proof, is created that further deferral of the sale is no longer an equitable method of minimizing the adverse impact of the divorce on the children.

In making an order pursuant to this section, the court shall reserve jurisdiction to determine any and all issues that arise with respect to the deferred sale of home order including, but not limited to, the maintenance of the home and the tax consequences to each party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 268, § 1.